Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.520

Injunction against violations.

The director is authorized to apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for, and such court upon hearing and for cause shown may grant, a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating any provision of this chapter.

[ 1969 c 67 s 52.]